Utah statutes.
70A-9a-525.   Fees.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3), the fee for the Division
of Corporations and Commercial Code filing and indexing a record under this
part, including an initial financing statement of the kind described in
Subsection 70A-9a-502(3), shall:
(a)  be determined by the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;
(b)  be reasonable and fair; and
(c)  reflect the cost of services provided.
(2)  The fee for the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code responding
to a request for information from the Division of Corporations and Commercial
Code, including for issuing a record showing whether there is on file any
financing statement naming a particular debtor shall:
(a)  be determined by the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;
(b)  be reasonable and fair; and
(c)  reflect the cost of services provided.
(3) (a)  This section does not require a fee with respect to a record of a
mortgage which is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing
or as a financing statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be
cut under Subsection 70A-9a-502(3).  However, the recording and satisfaction
fees that otherwise would be applicable to the record of the mortgage apply.
(b) (i)  This section does not apply to fees charged by a filing office
described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(a).
(ii)  A filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(a) shall charge
fees in accordance with Section 17-21-18.5.
